Utah statutes.
26-1-8.   Executive director -- Appointment -- Compensation.

The chief administrative officer of the department is the executive director who shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.  The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.  The governor shall establish the executive director's salary within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.



Amended by Chapter 176, 2002 General Session

